Vermont, session 2025-2026, S141.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4028 is added to read
§ 4028. POSSESSION OF FIREARMS AND DANGEROUS WEAPONS IN
STATE BUILDINGS PROHIBITED
(a) A person shall not knowingly possess a firearm or dangerous weapon in
a State building.
(b)(1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be
imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $2,000.00, or
both.
VT LEG #381999 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.141
2025 Page 2 of 4
(2) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section with the intent to
use the firearm or dangerous weapon to commit a crime shall be imprisoned
for not more than five years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.
(c) This section shall not apply to:
(1) a firearm or dangerous weapon carried for legitimate law
enforcement purposes by a federal law enforcement officer or a law
enforcement officer certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont
Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358;
(2) a firearm or dangerous weapon carried by a person while preforming
the person’s official duties as an employee of the United States; a department
or agency of the United States; a state; or a department, agency, or political
subdivision of a state if the person is authorized to carry a firearm or dangerous
weapon as part of the person’s official duties;
(3) a firearm or dangerous weapon carried by a member of the Vermont
National Guard, of the National Guard of another state, or of the U.S. Armed
Forces who is on duty and acting under state or federal orders;
(4) buildings or portions of buildings that are:
(A) owned or leased by the Department of Buildings and General
Services; and
(B) leased or subleased by the Department of Buildings and General
Services to private tenants for their exclusive use;
VT LEG #381999 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.141
2025 Page 3 of 4
(5) the lawful carrying of a firearm or dangerous weapon into a State
building for a purpose authorized in advance by the Department of Buildings
and General Services or by the tenant agency occupying or using the building;
or
(6) a firearm or dangerous weapon carried by an instructor, educator, or
participant in an educational or training class conducted by an agency or entity
of State government while engaging in the educational or training class or
activity, including the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Fish
and Wildlife, the Vermont Criminal Justice Council, and any other State
agency or entity that as part of its mission requires the use of firearms or other
dangerous weapons.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) “Dangerous or deadly weapon” means a weapon, device, instrument,
material, or substance, whether animate or inanimate, that is used or readily
capable of being used to cause death or serious bodily injury, including an
explosive as defined in section 1603 of this title, except that “dangerous or
deadly weapon” does not include a pocket knife with a blade of less than 2.5
inches in length.
(2) “Firearm” has the same meaning as in subsection 4017(d) of this
title.
VT LEG #381999 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.141
2025 Page 4 of 4
(3) “State building” means a building or part of a building owned or
leased by the Department of Buildings and General Services where State
employees are regularly present for the purpose of performing their official
duties and includes all owned or leased State buildings, structures, and
appurtenances under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Buildings and
General Services except as provided in 29 V.S.A. § 152(a)(9) and 29 V.S.A.
chapter 5A.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #381999 v.1